Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
710

OFFENSES
AGAINST PUBLIC ADMINISTRATION

Part I. General Provisions Relating to
Offenses

Against Public Administration

Section

710-1000 Definitions of terms in this chapter

710-1001 Forfeiture of property used as benefit
or pecuniary

benefit in the commission of an offense
defined in

this chapter

Part II. Obstruction of Public
Administration

710-1010 Obstructing government operations

710-1010.5 Interference with reporting an
emergency or crime

710-1011 Refusing to aid a law enforcement
officer

710-1012 Refusing to assist in fire control

710-1013 Compounding

710-1014 Rendering a false alarm

710-1014.5 Misuse of 911 emergency telephone
service

710-1015 False reporting to law-enforcement
authorities

710-1016 Impersonating a public servant

710-1016.3 Obtaining a government-issued
identification

document under false pretenses in the
first degree

710-1016.4 Obtaining a government-issued
identification

document under false pretenses in the
second degree

710-1016.5 Repealed

710-1016.6 Impersonating a law enforcement officer
in the

first degree

710-1016.7 Impersonating a law enforcement officer
in the

second degree

710-1016.8 Presumptions

710-1016.9 Defense

710-1017 Tampering with a government record

710-1017.5 Sale or manufacture of deceptive
identification

document; penalties

710-1018 Securing the proceeds of an offense

710-1019 Destroying or defacing official
notices; penalty

Part III. Escape and Other Offenses
Related to

Custody

710-1020 Escape in the first degree

710-1021 Escape in the second degree

710-1022 Promoting prison contraband in the
first degree

710-1023 Promoting prison contraband in the
second degree

710-1024 Bail jumping in the first degree

710-1025 Bail jumping in the second degree

710-1026 Resisting arrest

710-1026.9 Resisting an order to stop a motor
vehicle in the

first degree

710-1027 Resisting an order to stop a motor
vehicle

710-1028 Hindering prosecution; definition of
rendering

assistance

710-1029 Hindering prosecution in the first degree

710-1030 Hindering prosecution in the second
degree

710-1031 Intimidating a correctional worker

Part IV. Bribery

710-1040 Bribery

Part V. Perjury and Related Offenses

710-1060 Perjury

710-1061 False swearing in official matters

710-1062 False swearing

710-1063 Unsworn falsification to authorities

710-1064 Retraction

710-1065 Inconsistent statements

710-1066 No prosecution based on previous denial
of guilt

710-1067 Corroboration

710-1068 Irregularities no defense

710-1069 Misrepresenting a notarized document in
the first

degree

710-1069.5 Misrepresenting a notarized document in
the second

degree

Part VI. Offenses Related to Judicial
and Other

Proceedings

710-1070 Bribery of or by a witness

710-1071 Intimidating a witness

710-1072 Tampering with a witness

710-1072.2 Retaliating against a witness

710-1072.5 Obstruction of justice

710-1073 Bribery of or by a juror

710-1074 Intimidating a juror

710-1075 Jury tampering

710-1075.5 Retaliating against a juror

710-1076 Tampering with physical evidence

710-1077 Criminal contempt of court

710-1078 Disrespect of a house of the legislature

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next